
DIC3V−01

DI−60 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

LANDCRUISER(W/G)SUP(RM 1072E)

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART
NOTICE:
When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.
HINT:
S UsingSST09843 −18020,connect the terminalsTcandE

1
,and remove theshortpin.

S If anyabnormality isnot foundwhen inspectingparts, inspect theECU.
S If amalfunctioncode isdisplayedduring theDTCcheck,check thecircuit listed for thatcode.Forde-

tails of each code, turn to the page referred to under the ”See page” for respective ”DTC No.” in the
DTC chart.

DTC No.
(See Page)

Detection Item Trouble Area

C0278 / 11
O h t i ABS l id l i i t

SABSsolenoid rela yC0278 / 11
�

Openorshort inABSsolenoid relaycircuit
SABS solenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0279 / 12
�

B+ short in ABS solenoid relay circuit
SABSsolenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0226 /2 1
�

Openorshort inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit (SFR
circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRRorSFRHcircuit

C0236 /22
�

Openorshort inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit (SFL
circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLRorSFLHcircuit

C0246 /23
�

Openorshort inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit (SRR
circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRHorSRRcircuit

C1225 /25
�

Openorshort inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit (SA 1
circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA1 circuit

C1226 /26
�

Openorshort inhydraulicbrakeboostersolenoidcircuit (SA2
circuit)

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA2circuit

SRight front speed sensor
C0200 / 31*1

Riht f t h l d i l lf ti

SRight frontspee d sensor
S d i i t

C0200 / 31
(DI−79)

Right frontwheelspeedsensorsignalmalfunction SSpeedsensorcircuit
(DI−79)

g p g p
SSensor rotor

C0205 /32*
1

(DI−65)
Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

SLeft frontspeedsensor
SSpeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

C0210 /33*
1

(DI−65)
Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

SRight rearspeedsensor
SSpeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

C0215 /34*
1

(DI−65)
Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

SLeft rearspeedsensor
SSpeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

C1237 /37
�

Some tire is different size from the other tires STiresize

C1241 / 41
�

Lowbatteryvoltageoropencircuit in IG 1 circuit
SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

C1242 /42
�

Open circuit in IG2 circuit
SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

C1243 /43
�

Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output)
SDecelerationsensor
SWireharness fordecelerationsensorsystem

C1244 /44
�

Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit
SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

C1245 /45
�

Malfunction in deceleration sensor
SDecelerationsensor
SWire harness for deceleration sensor system



ECU

Power souse*

Hydraulic brake booster

Motor relay circuit

Accumulator malfunction

Pump motor circuit

Pressure switch PH

PL

Pump motor

MTT wire harness

MT+ wire harness
MT− wire harness

MR1 open circuit

MR2 open circuit

MR1 welded contact

MR2 welded contact

Pressure leaks

IG2 open circuit

Power supply circuit

Light Buzzer Light Light Light Light Light LightBuzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer Buzzer

DTC

BRAKE warning light and buzzer

42 51 52 53 54 56 57

*: When IG1 circuit is open, the ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come
on.
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−DIAGNOSTICS ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI−61

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM1072E)

C1248 / 48
�

S Open or short circuit in rear differential lock circuit
S Rear differential is locking

S Rear differential lock

C1249 / 49
�

Open circuit in stop light switch circuit S Stop light switch circuit

C1251 / 51*
2

�

S Pump motor is locked
S Open circuit in pump motor ground

S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

C1252 / 52*
2

�
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
S Pressure switch (PH or PL)

C1253 / 53*
2

�
Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction

S ABS motor relay
S ABS motor relay circuit

C1254 / 54*
2

�
Pressure switch malfunction

S Pressure switch (PH or PL)
S Pressure switch circuit

C1256 / 56*
2

�
Accumulator low pressure malfunction

S Accumulator
S Pressure switch (PH or PL)
S Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

C1257 / 57*
2

�
Power supply drive circuit malfunction

S Battery
S Power Source circuit
S ABS ECU

Always ON
�

Malfunction in ABS ECU

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit
SABSECU

*
1
:As theDTCcannotbeerasedby replacingpartsalonedoeitherof the followingoperations.

(1) Clear the DTC (See page DI−54).
(2)Atavehiclespeedof20km/h ( 12mph),drive thevehicle for30secondsormore.

*
2
:Using the following table, troubledpartscanbespecified.

� :Refer toLANDCRUISERRepairManualPub.No.RM6 16E


